California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) Each city or county mental health department is encouraged to include on its Internet Web site a current list of ambulatory services and other resources for persons with mental health disorders and substance use disorders in the city or county that may be accessed by providers and consumers of mental health services. The list of services on the Internet Web site should be updated at least annually by the city or county mental
 health department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 567, Sec. 3.   (SB 364)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5014.

(a) To the extent otherwise permitted under state and federal law and consistent with the Mental Health Services Act, both of the following apply for purposes of Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) of Chapter 2 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350):

(1) Counties may pay for the provision of services using funds distributed to the counties from the Mental Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Equity Subaccount, and the Vehicle License Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund, funds from the Mental Health Account and the Behavioral Health Subaccount within the Support Services Account of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, funds from the Behavioral Health Services Fund when included in county plans pursuant to
 Section 5847, and any other funds from which the Controller makes distributions to the counties for those purposes.

(2) A person shall not be denied access to services funded by the Behavioral Health Services Fund based solely on the person’s voluntary or involuntary legal status.

(b) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 36.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 85 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.1.

A minor with a mental health condition, between the ages of 3 and 18, upon being considered for release from a state hospital shall have an aftercare plan developed. Such plan shall include educational or training needs, provided these are necessary for the patient’s well-being.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 10.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5110.

Whenever a proceeding is held in a superior court under Article 5 (commencing with Section 5275) or Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of this chapter or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of this part involving a person who has been placed in a facility located outside the county of residence of the person, the provisions of this section shall apply. The appropriate financial officer or other designated official of the county in which the proceeding is held shall make out a statement of all of the costs incurred by the county for the investigation, preparation, and conduct of the proceedings, and the costs of appeal, if any. The statement shall be certified by a judge of the superior court of the county. The statement shall then be sent to the county of residence of the person, which shall reimburse the county providing the services. If it is not possible to determine the actual county of residence of the person, the statement shall be sent to the county in which the person was originally detained, which shall reimburse the county providing the services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 208.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5111.

Any county without a public defender is authorized to compensate the attorneys appointed for persons entitled to be represented by counsel in proceedings under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1627.)
-------------------------------------------

5113.

Except as provided in Sections 5154, 5173, 5259.3, 5267, and 5306, the facility providing treatment pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150), Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 5170), Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250), Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 5260), or Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 2, the superintendent of the facility, the professional person in charge of the facility and their designee, the professional person designated pursuant to Section 5121 and responsible for the detainment of the person, or the peace officer responsible
 for the detainment of the person shall not be civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released at or before the end of the period for which the person was admitted pursuant to the provisions of the appropriate article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.   (AB 416)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5114.

At any judicial proceeding under the provisions of this division, allegations that the person is a danger to others, or to himself, or gravely disabled as a result of mental disorder or impairment by chronic alcoholism, shall be presented by the district attorney for the county, unless the board of supervisors, by ordinance or resolution, delegates such duty to the county counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1627.)
-------------------------------------------

5115.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

(a) It is the policy of this state, as declared and established in this section and in the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act, Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500), that persons with mental health disorders or physical disabilities are entitled to live in normal residential surroundings and should not be excluded therefrom because of their disability.

(b) In order to achieve uniform statewide implementation of the policies of this section and those of the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act, it is necessary to establish the statewide policy that the use of property for the care of six or fewer persons with
 mental health disorders or other disabilities is a residential use of the property for the purposes of zoning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 87.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.

(a) Pursuant to the policy stated in Section 5115, a state-authorized, certified, or licensed family care home, foster home, or group home serving six or fewer persons with mental health disorders or other disabilities or dependent and neglected children, shall be considered a residential use of property for the purposes of zoning if the homes provide care on a 24-hour-a-day basis.

(b) These homes shall be a permitted use in all residential zones, including, but not limited to, residential zones for single-family dwellings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 88.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5117.

In order to further facilitate achieving the purposes of this act and the Lanterman Mental Retardation Act of 1969, it is desirable that there be a consolidation of the facilities standard setting, licensure and ratesetting functions of the various state departments under the jurisdiction of the Health and Welfare Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

5118.

(a) For the purpose of conducting hearings under this part, the court in and for the county where the petition is filed may be convened at any time and place within or outside the county suitable to the mental and physical health of the patient, and receive evidence both oral and written, and render decisions, except that the time and place for hearing shall not be different from the time and place for the trial of civil actions for such court if any party to the proceeding, prior to the hearing, objects to the different time or place.

(b) Hearings conducted at a state hospital or a mental health facility designated by a county as a treatment facility under
 this part or any facility referred to in Section 5358 or Division 7 (commencing with Section 7100), within or outside the county, shall be deemed to be hearings held in a place for the trial of civil actions and in a regular courtroom of the court.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as otherwise
 provided in this subdivision, a hearing held under this part is presumptively closed to the public if that hearing involves the disclosure of confidential information.

(2) The individual who is the subject of the proceeding may demand that the hearing be public, and be held in a place suitable for attendance by the public.

(3) The individual who is the subject of the proceeding may also request the presence of any family member or friend without waiving the right to keep the hearing closed to the rest of the public.

(4) A request
 by any other party to the proceeding to make the hearing public may be granted if the judge, hearing officer, or other person conducting the hearing finds that the public interest in an open hearing clearly outweighs the individual’s interest in
 privacy.

(5) Before commencing a hearing, the judge, hearing officer, or other person conducting the hearing shall inform the individual who is the subject of the proceeding of their rights under this section.

(d) As used in this section, “hearing” means any proceeding conducted under this part, including, but not limited to, conservatorship and other hearings held pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350), certification review hearings, and jury trials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5119.

On and after July 1, 1972, when a person who is an employee of the State Department of Mental Health at the time of employment by a county in a county mental health program or on and after July 1, 1972, when a person has been an employee of the State Department of Mental Health within the 12-month period prior to his employment by a county in a county mental health program, the board of supervisors may, to the extent feasible, allow such person to retain as a county employee, those employee benefits to which he was entitled or had accumulated as an employee of the State Department of Mental Health or provide such employee with comparable benefits provided for other county employees whose service as county employees is equal to the state service of the former employee of the State Department of Mental Health. Such benefits include, but are not limited to, retirement benefits, seniority rights under civil service, accumulated vacation and sick leave.

The county may on and after July 1, 1972, establish retraining programs for the State Department of Mental Health employees transferring to county mental health programs provided such programs are financed entirely with state and federal funds made available for that purpose.

For the purpose of this section “employee of the Department of Mental Health” means an employee of such department who performs functions which, prior to July 1, 1973, were vested in the Department of Mental Hygiene.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

5120.

It is the policy of this state as declared and established in this act and in the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act that the care and treatment of individuals with a mental health condition be provided in the local community. In order to achieve uniform statewide implementation of the policies of this act, it is necessary to establish the statewide policy that, notwithstanding any other provision of law, no city or county shall discriminate in the enactment, enforcement, or administration of any zoning laws, ordinances, or rules and regulations between the use of property for the treatment of general hospital or nursing home patients and the use of property for the psychiatric care and treatment of patients, both inpatient and
 outpatient.

Health facilities for inpatient and outpatient psychiatric care and treatment shall be permitted in any area zoned for hospitals or nursing homes, or in which hospitals and nursing homes are permitted by conditional use permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 11.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5121.

(a) The county behavioral health director may develop procedures for the county’s designation and training of professionals who will be designated to perform functions under Section 5150. These procedures may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) The license types, practice disciplines, and clinical experience of professionals eligible to be designated by the county.

(2) The initial and ongoing training and testing requirements for professionals eligible to be designated by the county.

(3) The application and approval processes for professionals seeking
 to be designated by the county, including the timeframe for initial designation and procedures for renewal of the designation.

(4) The county’s process for monitoring and reviewing professionals designated by the county to ensure appropriate compliance with state law, regulations, and county procedures.

(b) A county behavioral health director may develop a training for the procedures for designation developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) If a county behavioral health director denies or revokes an individual’s designation, the county behavioral health director shall, in writing, notify the person who made the request for designation of the individual and the individual who is the subject of the request for
 designation describing the reasons for denial or revocation.

(d) Designated members of a mobile crisis team and designated professional persons shall not be prohibited from transporting a person taken into custody pursuant to Section 5150.

(e) If the county behavioral health director of the County of Sacramento develops procedures pursuant to subdivision (a), the county behavioral health director of the County of Sacramento shall, by April 1, 2022, issue a written policy regarding the procedures developed pursuant to subdivision (a). The policy shall address, at a minimum, the topics identified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a). The policy shall require the county behavioral health director of the County of Sacramento to designate individuals employed by
 the City of Sacramento who are also members of a mobile crisis team or who are also professional persons if all of the following are true:

(1) The City of Sacramento submits a written request to the county behavioral health director.

(2) The individuals meet the requirements for designation included in the policy.

(3) If the county behavioral health director of the County of Sacramento has developed a training pursuant to subdivision (b), the individuals have completed that training.

(f) (1) A county behavioral health director shall include an emergency physician as
 one of the practice disciplines eligible to be designated by the county when developing and implementing procedures pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). 

(2) This subdivision does not affect the training, application, approval, and revocation process that applies to all professionals who are eligible to be designated by the county, including an emergency physician, in order to be designated by the county to perform functions under Section 5150.

(3) For purposes of this section, “emergency physician” means a physician and surgeon who provides medical
 screening and treatment of patients in the emergency department of a general acute care hospital licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 691, Sec. 2.   (AB 416)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5122.

(a) For purposes of an opinion offered by an expert witness in a proceeding relating to the appointment or reappointment of a conservator pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5450), the statement of a health practitioner, as defined in subdivision (d), included in the medical record is not made inadmissible by the hearsay rule when the statement pertains to the person’s symptoms or behavior stemming from a mental health disorder or severe substance use disorder that the expert relies upon to explain the basis for their opinion, if the statement is based on the observation of the declarant, and the court finds, in a hearing conducted outside the presence of the jury, that
 the time, content, and circumstances of the statement provide sufficient indicia of reliability.

(b) This section does not affect the ability of a party to call as a witness the declarant of any statement contained in the medical record, whether or not the declarant’s statement was relied on by the expert witness.

(c) The court may grant a reasonable continuance if an expert witness in a proceeding relied on the medical record and the medical record has not been provided to the parties or their counsel.

(d) (1) “Health practitioner” means a physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, resident, intern, registered nurse, licensed clinical social worker or associate clinical social worker,
 licensed marriage and family therapist or associate marriage and family therapist, licensed professional clinical counselor or associate professional clinical counselor, any emergency medical technician I or II, paramedic, or person certified pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code, and a psychological associate registered pursuant to Section 2913 of the Business and Professions
 Code.

(2) “Medical record” means any record, in any form or medium, maintained or lawfully obtained by, or in the custody or control of, the office of the public conservator or public guardian that is prepared by a health practitioner and relates to the health history, diagnosis, or condition of a patient, or relating to treatment provided or proposed to be provided to the patient who is subject to a conservatorship pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350). Medical record includes records of care in any health-related setting used by health care professionals while providing patient care services, for reviewing patient data or documenting observations, actions, or instructions, including records that are considered part of the active, overflow, and discharge chart. Medical record also includes, but is not limited to,
 all alcohol and substance use and treatment records.

(e) Nothing in this section affects the application of Section 1201 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 637, Sec. 3.   (SB 43)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Involuntary Treatment [5150. - 5349.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Detention of Persons with a Mental Health Condition for Evaluation and Treatment [5150. - 5155.]

5150.

(a) When a person, as a result of a mental health disorder, is a danger to others, or to themselves, or gravely disabled, a peace officer, professional person in charge of a facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment, member of the attending staff, as defined by regulation, of a facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment, designated members of a mobile crisis team, or professional person designated by the county may, upon probable cause, take, or cause to be taken, the person into custody for a period of up to 72 hours for assessment, evaluation, and crisis intervention, or placement for evaluation and treatment in a facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment and approved by the State
 Department of Health Care Services. The 72-hour period begins at the time when the person is first detained. At a minimum, assessment, as defined in Section 5150.4, and evaluation, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5008, shall be conducted and provided on an ongoing basis. Crisis intervention, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 5008, may be provided concurrently with assessment, evaluation, or any other service.

(b) When determining if a person should be taken into custody pursuant to subdivision (a), the individual making that determination shall apply the provisions of Section 5150.05, and shall not be limited to consideration of the danger of imminent harm.

(c) The professional person in charge of a facility designated by the county for evaluation and
 treatment, member of the attending staff, or professional person designated by the county shall assess the person to determine whether the person can be properly served without being detained. If, in the judgment of the professional person in charge of the facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment, member of the attending staff, or professional person designated by the county, the person can be properly served without being detained, the person shall be provided evaluation, crisis intervention, or other inpatient or outpatient services on a voluntary basis. This subdivision does not prevent a peace officer from delivering an individual to a designated facility for assessment under this section. Furthermore, the assessment requirement of this subdivision does not require a peace officer to perform any additional duties other than those specified in Sections 5150.1 and 5150.2.

(d) If a person is evaluated by a professional person in charge of a facility designated by the county for evaluation or treatment, member of the attending staff, or professional person designated by the county and is found to be in need of mental health services, but is not admitted to the facility, all available alternative services provided pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be offered, as determined by the county mental health director.

(e) If, in the judgment of the professional person in charge of the facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment, member of the attending staff, or the professional person designated by the county, the person cannot be properly served without being detained, the admitting facility shall require an application in writing stating
 the circumstances under which the person’s condition was called to the attention of the peace officer, professional person in charge of the facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment, member of the attending staff, or professional person designated by the county, and stating that the peace officer, professional person in charge of the facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment, member of the attending staff, or professional person designated by the county has probable cause to believe that the person is, as a result of a mental health disorder, a danger to others, or to themselves, or gravely disabled. The application shall also record whether the historical course of the person’s mental disorder was considered in the determination, pursuant to Section 5150.05. If the probable cause is based on the statement of a person other than the peace officer,
 professional person in charge of the facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment, member of the attending staff, or professional person designated by the county, the person shall be liable in a civil action for intentionally giving a statement that the person knows to be false. A copy of the application shall be treated as the original.

(f) At the time a person is taken into custody for evaluation, or within a reasonable time thereafter, unless a responsible relative or the guardian or conservator of the person is in possession of the person’s personal property, the person taking them into custody shall take reasonable precautions to preserve and safeguard the
 personal property in the possession of or on the premises occupied by the person. The person taking them into custody shall then furnish to the court a report generally describing the person’s property so preserved and safeguarded and its disposition, in substantially the form set forth in Section 5211, except that if a responsible relative or the guardian or conservator of the person is in possession of the person’s property, the report shall include only the name of the relative or guardian or conservator and the location of the property, whereupon responsibility of the person taking them into custody for that property shall terminate. As used in this section, “responsible relative” includes the spouse, parent, adult child, domestic partner, grandparent, grandchild, or adult brother or sister of the person.

(g) (1) Each person, at the time the person is first taken into custody under this section, shall be provided, by the person who takes them into custody, the following information orally in a language or modality accessible to the person. If the person cannot understand an oral advisement, the information shall be provided in writing. The information shall be in substantially the following form:My name is .I am a (peace officer/mental health professional) .with (name of agency) .You are not under criminal arrest, but I am taking you for an examination by mental health professionals at .(name of facility)You will be told your rights by the mental health staff.(2) If taken into custody at the person’s own residence, the person shall also be provided the following information:
You may bring a few personal items with you, which I will have to
 approve. Please inform me if you need assistance turning off any appliance or water. You may make a phone call and leave a note to tell your friends or family where you have been taken.
(h) The designated facility shall keep, for each patient evaluated, a record of the advisement given pursuant to subdivision (g) which shall include all of the following:

(1) The name of the person detained for evaluation.

(2) The name and position of the peace officer or mental health professional taking the person into custody.

(3) The date the advisement was completed.

(4) Whether the advisement was completed.

(5) The language or modality used to give the advisement.

(6) If the advisement was not completed, a statement of good cause, as defined by regulations of the State Department of Health Care Services.

(i) (1) Each person admitted to a facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment shall be given the following information by admission staff of the facility. The information shall be given orally and in writing and in a language or modality accessible to the person. The written information shall be available to the person in English and in the language that is the person’s primary means of communication. Accommodations for other disabilities
 that may affect communication shall also be provided. The information shall be in substantially the following form:My name is .My position here is.You are being placed into this psychiatric facility because it is our professional opinion that, as a result of a mental health disorder, you are likely to (check applicable):◻ Harm
 yourself.
◻ Harm someone else.
◻ Be unable to take care of your own food, clothing, and housing needs.
 We believe this is true because(list of the facts upon which the allegation of dangerous 
or gravely disabled due to mental health disorder is based, including pertinent 
facts arising from the admission interview).You will be held for a period up to 72 hours. During the 72 hours you may also be transferred to another facility. You may request to be evaluated or treated at a facility of your choice. You may
 request to be evaluated or treated by a mental health professional of your choice. We cannot guarantee the facility or mental health professional you choose will be available, but we will honor your choice if we can.During these 72 hours you will be evaluated by the facility staff, and you may be given treatment, including medications. It is possible for you to be released before the end of the 72 hours. But if the staff decides that you need continued treatment you can be held for a longer period of time. If you are held longer than 72 hours, you have the right to a lawyer and a qualified interpreter and a hearing before a judge. If you are unable to pay for the lawyer, then one will be provided to you free of charge.If you have
 questions about your legal rights, you may contact the county Patients’ Rights Advocate at (phone number for the county Patients’ Rights Advocacy office).Your 72-hour period began (date/time).(2) If the notice is given in a county where weekends and holidays are excluded from the 72-hour period, the person shall be informed of this fact.

(j) For each person admitted for evaluation and treatment, the facility shall keep with the person’s medical record a record of the advisement given pursuant to subdivision (i), which shall include all of the following:

(1) The name of the person performing the advisement.

(2) The date of the advisement.

(3) Whether the advisement was completed.

(4) The language or modality used to communicate the advisement.

(5) If the advisement was not completed, a statement of good cause.

(k) A facility to which a person who is involuntarily detained pursuant to this section is transported shall notify the county patients’ rights advocate, as defined in Section 5500, if a person has not been released within 72 hours of the involuntary
 detention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 960, Sec. 1.   (AB 2275)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5150.05.

(a) When determining if probable cause exists to take a person into custody, or cause a person to be taken into custody, pursuant to Section 5150, a person who is authorized to take that person, or cause that person to be taken, into custody pursuant to that section shall consider available relevant information about the historical course of the person’s mental disorder if the authorized person determines that the information has a reasonable bearing on the determination as to whether the person is a danger to others or to themselves, or is gravely disabled.

(b) For purposes of this section, “information about the historical course of the person’s
 mental disorder” includes evidence presented by the person who has provided or is providing mental health or related support services to the person subject to a determination described in subdivision (a), evidence presented by one or more members of the family of that person, and evidence presented by the person subject to a determination described in subdivision (a) or anyone designated by that person.

(c) If the probable cause in subdivision (a) is based on the statement of a person other than the one authorized to take the person into custody pursuant to Section 5150, a member of the attending staff, or a professional person, the person making the statement shall be liable in a civil action for intentionally giving a statement that they know to be false.

(d) This section does
 not limit the application of Section 5328.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 492, Sec. 12.   (SB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5150.1.

No peace officer seeking to transport, or having transported, a person to a designated facility for assessment under Section 5150, shall be instructed by mental health personnel to take the person to, or keep the person at, a jail solely because of the unavailability of an acute bed, nor shall the peace officer be forbidden to transport the person directly to the designated facility. No mental health employee from any county, state, city, or any private agency providing Short-Doyle psychiatric emergency services shall interfere with a peace officer performing duties under Section 5150 by preventing the peace officer from entering
 a designated facility with the person to be assessed, nor shall any employee of such an agency require the peace officer to remove the person without assessment as a condition of allowing the peace officer to depart.

“Peace officer” for the purposes of this section also means a jailer seeking to transport or transporting a person in custody to a designated facility for assessment consistent with Section 4011.6 or 4011.8 of the Penal Code and Section 5150.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1286, Sec. 6.2.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5150.2.

In each county whenever a peace officer has transported a person to a designated facility for assessment under Section 5150, that officer shall be detained no longer than the time necessary to complete documentation of the factual basis of the detention under Section 5150 and a safe and orderly transfer of physical custody of the person. The documentation shall include detailed information regarding the factual circumstances and observations constituting probable cause for the peace officer to believe that the individual required psychiatric evaluation under the standards of Section 5105.

Each county shall establish disposition procedures and guidelines with local law enforcement agencies as necessary to relate to persons not admitted for evaluation and treatment and who decline alternative mental health services and to relate to the safe and orderly transfer of physical custody of persons under Section 5150, including those who have a criminal detention pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1286, Sec. 6.4.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5150.4.

“Assessment” for the purposes of this article, means the determination of whether a person shall be evaluated and treated pursuant to Section 5150.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1286, Sec. 6.7.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5150.5.

(a) An examination or assessment pursuant to Section 5150 or 5151 may be conducted using telehealth. An examination or assessment provided pursuant to
 Section 5150 or 5151 shall be consistent with the county’s authority to designate facilities for evaluation and treatment, pursuant to Sections 5150 and 5404.

(b) For the purposes of this section and Section 5151, “telehealth” means the mode of delivering health care services and public health via information and communication technologies, as defined in Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 149, Sec. 2.   (AB 3242)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5151.

(a) If the facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment admits the person, it may detain the person for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed 72 hours from the time that the person was first detained pursuant to Section 5150. Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays may be excluded from the period if the State Department of Health Care Services certifies for each facility that evaluation and treatment services cannot reasonably be made available on those days. The certification by the department is subject to renewal every two years. The department shall adopt regulations defining criteria for determining
 whether a facility can reasonably be expected to make evaluation and treatment services available on Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

(b) Prior to admitting a person to the facility for treatment and evaluation pursuant to Section 5150, the professional person in charge of the facility or a designee shall assess the individual to determine the appropriateness of the involuntary detention. This assessment shall be made face-to-face either in person or by synchronous interaction through a mode of telehealth that utilizes both audio and visual components.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 960, Sec. 2.   (AB 2275)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.

(a) A person admitted to a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation under the provisions of this article shall receive an evaluation as soon as possible after the person is admitted and shall receive whatever treatment and care the person’s condition requires for the full period that they are held. The person shall be released before 72 hours have elapsed only if the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment believes, as a result of the psychiatrist’s personal observations, that the person no longer requires evaluation or treatment. However, in those situations in which both a psychiatrist and psychologist have personally evaluated or examined a person who is placed under a 72-hour hold and there is a collaborative
 treatment relationship between the psychiatrist and psychologist, either the psychiatrist or
 psychologist may authorize the release of the person from the hold, but only after they have consulted with one another. In the event of a clinical or professional disagreement regarding the early release of a person who has been placed under a 72-hour hold, the hold shall be maintained unless the facility’s medical director overrules the decision of the psychiatrist or psychologist opposing the release. Both the psychiatrist and psychologist shall enter their findings, concerns, or objections into the person’s medical record. If any other professional person who is authorized to release the person believes the person should be released before 72 hours have elapsed, and the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment objects, the matter shall be referred to the medical director of the facility for the final decision. However, if the medical director is not a psychiatrist, the
 medical director shall appoint a designee who is a psychiatrist. If the matter is referred, the person shall be released before 72 hours have elapsed only if the psychiatrist making the final decision believes, as a result of the psychiatrist’s personal observations, that the person no longer requires evaluation or treatment.

(b) A person who has been detained for evaluation and treatment shall be released, referred for further care and treatment on a voluntary basis, or certified for intensive treatment, or a conservator or temporary conservator shall be appointed pursuant to this part as required.

(c) (1) A person who has been detained for evaluation and treatment and
 subsequently released with referral for further care and treatment on a voluntary basis, shall receive, prior to release, a care coordination plan developed by, at a minimum, the individual, the county behavioral health department, the health care payer, if different from the county, and any other individuals designated by the person as appropriate, with input and recommendations from the facility. The care coordination plan shall include a first followup appointment with an appropriate behavioral health professional. The appointment information shall be provided to the person before their release. In no event may the person be detained based on the requirements of this subdivision beyond when they would otherwise qualify for release. All care and treatment after release shall be voluntary.

(2) The requirement to develop a care coordination plan under this subdivision shall take effect immediately, without waiting for the department to create a model care coordination plan, as required pursuant to Section 5402.5.
